Utah statutes.
16-6a-111.   Appeal from division's refusal to file document.

If the division refuses to file a document delivered to it for filing, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the following may appeal the refusal to the executive director:

(1)  the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation for which the filing was requested; or

(2)  the representative of the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation for which filing was requested.

